Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 2. Juvenile Justice Act

Cross references. —

For provisions of the Community Juvenile Services Act, see ch. 9 of this title. As to detention and incarceration of juvenile offenders, see §§

5-6-112

and

5-6-113

. As to crimes and offenses generally, see title 6.

Article relates to procedure.

In re Jones, 500 P.2d 690,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 298

(Wyo. 1972).

Minor's due process rights violated. —

Trial court violated minor's due process rights when it found her in contempt of court and placed her in a school for girls without notifying her that she could be declared to be a delinquent child and placed in the girls' school if she violated the juvenile court's order and the court failed to file a petition in the juvenile court stating the jurisdictional facts as required by §

14-6-212

.TLL v. State (In the Interest of TLL), 899 P.2d 44,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1995).

Remedy for failure to set hearing. —

The proper remedy for a failure to set an adjudicatory hearing within the time constraints of §§

14-6-209

and

14-6-226

is a motion to the juvenile court for a prompt hearing brought by the minor through the guardian ad litem, or brought by the parents, guardians or custodian named in the petition as parties to the proceeding; if such a motion is not acted upon in a timely fashion, then a petition for a writ of habeas corpus may be filed in the supreme court seeking release of the minor. In In Interest of MFB, 860 P.2d 1140,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1993).

Cited

in

In Interest of DG, 825 P.2d 369,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1992); RM v. Washakie County Sch. Dist. No. One, 2004 WY 162, 102 P.3d 868,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 208

(2004).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Wyoming Juvenile Court Act of 1971,” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 237 (1973).

For article “Child Protection: A Suggested Role for Members of the Wyoming State Bar,” see IX Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1974).

For comment, “Prosecution as a Juvenile or an Adult: Is the Discretion Vested in the District Attorney by Section 14-6-203(c) of the Wyoming Statutes Unconstitutional and Violative of the Proper Role of a Prosecutor?” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

47 Am. Jur. 2d Juvenile Courts and Delinquent and Dependent Children § 1 et seq.

Right of bail in juvenile court proceedings, 53 ALR3d 848.

Extradition of juveniles, 73 ALR3d 700.

Application of rule of Dorszynski v. United States requiring that sentencing court make express finding of “no benefit” from treatment under Youth Corrections Act (18 USC § 5005 et seq. [repealed]), 54 ALR Fed 382.

Consideration of offenses committed while a juvenile in the computation of criminal history under United States Sentencing Guideline (18 UCCS Appx. § 4A1.2), 135 ALR Fed 619.

Treatment, under Federal Juvenile Delinquency Act (18 USCS §§ 5031-5042), of juvenile alleged to have violated law of United States, 137 ALR Fed 481.

§ 14-6-201.
Definitions; short title; statement of purpose and interpretation.

As used in this act:

“Adjudication” means a finding by the court or the jury, incorporated in a decree, as to the truth of the facts alleged in the petition;

“Adult” means an individual who has attained the age of majority;

“Child” means an individual who is under the age of majority;

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 3.

“Clerk” means the clerk of a district court acting as the clerk of a juvenile court;

“Commissioner” means a district court commissioner;

“Court” means the juvenile court established by W.S.

5-8-101

;

“Custodian” means a person, institution or agency responsible for the child’s welfare and having legal custody of a child by court order or having actual physical custody and control of a child and acting in loco parentis;

“Delinquent act” means an act punishable as a criminal offense by the laws of this state or any political subdivision thereof, or contempt of court under W.S.

14-6-242

, or an act violating the terms and conditions of any court order which resulted from the criminal conviction of any child but does not include a status offense;

“Delinquent child” means a child who has committed a delinquent act;

“Deprivation of custody” means transfer of legal custody by the court from a parent or previous legal custodian to another person, agency, organization or institution;

“Detention” means the temporary care of a child in physically restricting facilities pending court disposition or the execution of a court order to place or commit a child to a juvenile detention facility;

“Judge” means the judge of the juvenile court;

“Legal custody” means as defined in W.S. 14-3-402(a)(x);

“Minor” means an individual who is under the age of majority;

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 3.

“Parent” means either a natural or adoptive parent of the child, a person adjudged the parent of the child in judicial proceedings or a man presumed to be the father under W.S.

14-2-504

;

“Parties” include the child, his parents, guardian or custodian, the state of Wyoming and any other person made a party by an order to appear, or named by the juvenile court;

“Probation” means a legal status created by court order following an adjudication of delinquency or of a status offense where a child is permitted to remain in his home subject to supervision by a city or county probation officer, the department or other qualified private organization the court may designate. A child is subject to return to the court for violation of the terms or conditions of probation provided for in the court order;

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 3.

“Residual parental rights and duties” means those rights and duties remaining with the parents after custody, guardianship of the person or both have been vested in another person, agency or institution. Residual parental rights and duties include but are not limited to:

The duty to support and provide necessities of life;

The right to consent to adoption;

The right to reasonable visitation unless restricted or prohibited by court order;

The right to determine the minor’s religious affiliation; and

The right to petition on behalf of the minor.

“Shelter care” means the temporary care of a child in physically unrestricting facilities pending court disposition or execution of a court order for placement or commitment;

“Status offense” means an offense which, if committed by an adult, would not constitute an act punishable as a criminal offense by the laws of this state or a violation of a municipal ordinance, but does not include a violation of W.S. 12-6-101(b) or (c) or any similar municipal ordinance;

“Juvenile detention facility” means any facility which may legally and physically restrict and house a child, other than the Wyoming boys’ school, the Wyoming girls’ school, the Wyoming state hospital or other private or public psychiatric facility within the state of Wyoming. “Juvenile detention facility” does not include any residential treatment facility which is operated for the primary purpose of providing treatment to a child. A juvenile detention facility may be housed within an adult jail or correction facility if the facility otherwise meets the requirements of state law;

“Department” means the Wyoming department of family services;

“Another planned permanent living arrangement” means a permanency plan for youth sixteen (16) years of age or older other than reunification, adoption, legal guardianship or placement with a fit and willing relative;

“Qualified individual” means a person who meets the requirements of 42 U.S.C. § 675a(c)(1)(D);

“Qualified residential treatment program” means a program that meets the requirements of 42 U.S.C. § 672(k)(4);

“This act” means W.S.

14-6-201

through

14-6-252

.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Juvenile Justice Act”.

This act shall be construed to effectuate the following public purposes:

To provide for the best interests of the child and the protection of the public and public safety;

Consistent with the best interests of the child and the protection of the public and public safety:

To promote the concept of punishment for criminal acts while recognizing and distinguishing the behavior of children who have been victimized or have disabilities, such as serious mental illness that requires treatment or children with a cognitive impairment that requires services;

To remove, where appropriate, the taint of criminality from children committing certain unlawful acts; and

To provide treatment, training and rehabilitation that emphasizes the accountability and responsibility of both the parent and the child for the child’s conduct, reduces recidivism and helps children to become functioning and contributing adults.

To provide for the care, the protection and the wholesome moral, mental and physical development of children within the community whenever possible using the least restrictive and most appropriate interventions;

To be flexible and innovative and encourage coordination at the community level to reduce the commission of unlawful acts by children;

To achieve the foregoing purposes in a family environment whenever possible, separating the child from the child’s parents only when necessary for the child’s welfare or in the interest of public safety and when a child is removed from the child’s family, to ensure that individual needs will control placement and provide the child the care that should be provided by parents; and

To provide a simple judicial procedure through which the provisions of this act are executed and enforced and in which the parties are assured a fair and timely hearing and their constitutional and other legal rights recognized and enforced.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.2; Laws 1976, ch. 3, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

14-8-102

; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1984, ch. 67, §§ 1, 2; 1987, ch. 221, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 1993, ch. 161, § 1; ch. 210, § 2; 1995, ch. 122, § 2; ch. 154, § 1; ch. 202, § 2; 1996, ch. 49, § 1; ch. 106, § 1; 1997, ch. 119, § 2; ch. 149, § 1; ch. 199, §§ 2, 3; 1998, ch. 7, § 1; 2003, ch. 93, § 2; 2004, ch. 127, § 2; 2008, ch. 18, § 1; 2016 ch. 56, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2016 ch. 95, § 2, effective March 4, 2016; 2020 ch. 2, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to age of majority, see §

14-1-101

.

For the Juvenile Justice Information System Act, see §

7-19-501

et seq.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (a)(xii), substituted “to place or commit a child to a juvenile detention facility” for “for placement or commitment,” and in (a)(xiv) substituted “as defined in W.S. 14-3-402(a)(x)” for provisions pertaining to a legal status created by court order vesting in a custodian rights and duties over a minor; in (c)(i) and (ii), inserted “best interests of the child and the” preceding “protection of the public and public safety,” in (c)(ii)(A), added the language beginning “while recognizing and distinguishing the behavior” at the end, in (c)(ii)(C) added the language beginning “reduces recidivism” at the end, in (c)(iv) substituted “be flexible and innovative and encourage coordination at” for “protect the welfare of,” and “level to reduce the commission” for “and to control the commission,” in (c)(v) substituted “ensure that individual needs will control placement and provide” for “give,” and in (c)(vi) inserted “and timely” following “parties are assured a fair”; and made stylistic changes throughout.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, in (a)(xix), inserted “or of a status offense” in the first sentence, inserted “provided for in the court order” in the second sentence.

The 2016 amendments. —

The first 2016 amendment, by ch. 95, §
1, effective July 1, 2016, added the second sentence in (a)(xxiv).

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 95, §
2, effective July 1, 2016, redesignated former (a)(xxvi) as (a)(xxvii), and added (a)(xxvi).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (a)(xxvii), (a)(xxviii), and redesignated former (a)(xxvii) as (a)(xxix).

Effective dates. —

Laws 2016, ch. 95, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8, Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 4, 2016.

Purpose. —

Proceedings under the Juvenile Justice Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-6-201

et seq., are not criminal, but are special proceedings, the proceedings are equitable and not punitive to accomplish the purpose of providing treatment, training and rehabilitation for children, and to provide for the care, the protection and the wholesome moral, mental and physical development of children coming within its provisions; as such they are entitled to a liberal effect and a practical construction in favor of the child's welfare. TPJ v. State, 2003 WY 49, 66 P.3d 710,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 2003).

Interested relative of neglected child may become “party” in neglect action

through a motion to grant present custody. In In Interest of MKM, 792 P.2d 1369,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 1990).

Evidence supported finding of “neglect”

where the mother left her children with another family which fed and clothed the children without reimbursement and paid for medication used to treat an ear infection developed by one of the children. In In Interest of N.M., 794 P.2d 564,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 1990).

State met its burden of proving child neglect, where record was clear that three days after infant's discharge from hospital for pneumonia, mother still had not provided infant with prescribed medication; expert medical testimony was not required for juvenile court's understanding of evidence before it, and record controverted mother's argument that poverty prevented her from providing the prescribed medication. MP v. State ex rel. CP, 965 P.2d 1155,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1998).

No conflict with Wyoming Sexual Offender Registration Act.—

Registration
and limited notification requirements for certain adjudicated delinquents
under the Wyoming Sexual Offender Registration Act (WSORA) did not
conflict with the purposes of the Wyoming Juvenile Justice Act (WJJA), Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-6-201

et seq., as the language of the WJJA showed that it was
to be administered to assure public safety as well as promote the
interest of the child and was drafter with knowledge of the WSORA. Vaughn v. State, 2017 WY 29, 391 P.3d 1086,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2017).

Standards for juvenile proceedings.

Finding that
petitioner, a juvenile, was competent to proceeding to adjudication
in a delinquency proceeding was improper because, although the juvenile
court ordered a competency evaluation and ruled that petitioner was
competent to proceed, it did not evaluate him under the correct standards
set out in
Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

7-11-302

and

7-11-303

. The psychologist offered the opinion that he appeared
to be less familiar with general legal terms and concepts than the
average adult defendant, but because he was 12 at the time, the juvenile
should not have been compared to the average adult defendant, but
to an average child of the same age.
SWM v. State, 2013 WY 49, 299 P.3d 673,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2013).

Applied

in

KT v. State, 902 P.2d 1288,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1995);
K.C. v. State, 2011 WY 108,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Jul 12, 2011).

Stated

in

Michael v. Hertzler, 900 P.2d 1144,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 1995); Ct v. State, 2006 WY 101, 140 P.3d 643,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(2006).

Quoted

in

Campbell v. State, 709 P.2d 425,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 608

(Wyo. 1985);
CB v. State, 749 P.2d 267,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1988); In
Interest of WM, 778 P.2d 1106,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1989); In
Interest of C. N., 816 P.2d 1282,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 1991); Vaughn v. State, 2017 WY 29, 391 P.3d 1086,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2017).

Cited

in

DH v. Wyo. Dep't of Family Servs. (In re “H” Children), 2003 WY 155, 79 P.3d 997,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 2003); RM v. State (In re JM), 2014 WY 114,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Sept. 16, 2014); Triangle Cross Ranch, Inc. v. State, 2015 WY 47,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Mar. 26, 2015); Vaughn v. State, 2017 WY 29, 391 P.3d 1086,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2017).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Truancy as indicative of delinquency or incorrigibility, justifying commitment of infant or juvenile, 5 ALR4th 1211.

Defense of infancy in juvenile delinquency proceedings, 83 ALR4th 1135.

Admissibility of evidence discovered in search of defendant's property or residence authorized by defendant's spouse (resident or nonresident) — state cases, 65 ALR5th 407.

§ 14-6-202.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 3, established and provided judges for juvenile courts.

§ 14-6-203.
Jurisdiction; confidentiality of records. [Effective until July 1, 2024]

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 3.

Coincident with proceedings concerning a minor alleged to be delinquent, the court has jurisdiction to:

Determine questions concerning the right to legal custody of the minor;

Order any party to the proceedings to perform any acts, duties and responsibilities the court deems necessary; or

Order any party to the proceedings to refrain from any act or conduct the court deems detrimental to the best interest and welfare of the minor or essential to the enforcement of any lawful order of disposition of the minor made by the court.

Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, the juvenile court has concurrent jurisdiction in all cases, other than status offenses, in which a minor is alleged to have committed a criminal offense or to have violated a municipal ordinance.

The juvenile court has exclusive jurisdiction in all cases, other than status offenses, in which a minor who has not attained the age of thirteen (13) years is alleged to have committed a felony or a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for more than six (6) months.

Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, all cases over which the juvenile court has concurrent jurisdiction shall be originally commenced in the juvenile court but may thereafter be transferred to another court having jurisdiction pursuant to W.S.

14-6-237

.

The district attorney shall establish objective criteria, screening and assessment procedures for determining the court for appropriate disposition in cooperation and coordination with each municipality in the jurisdiction of the district court. The district attorney shall serve as the single point of entry for all minors alleged to have committed a crime. Except as otherwise provided in this section, copies of all charging documents, reports or citations for cases provided in this subsection shall be forwarded to the district attorney prior to the filing of the charge, report or citation in municipal or city court. The following cases, excluding status offenses, may be originally commenced either in the juvenile court or in the district court or inferior court having jurisdiction:

Violations of municipal ordinances, except that if a juvenile is sentenced in a municipal court to a sentence exceeding ten (10) days of jail or detention, the municipal court shall provide to the district attorney in the juvenile’s county of residency and the department of education a copy of the judgment and sentence;

All misdemeanors except:

Those cases within the exclusive jurisdiction of the juvenile court; and

If a juvenile is sentenced in a municipal or circuit court to a sentence exceeding ten (10) days of jail or detention, the municipal or circuit court shall provide to the district attorney in the juvenile’s county of residency and the department of education a copy of the judgment and sentence.

Felony cases in which the minor has attained the age of seventeen (17) years. The prosecuting attorney shall consider those determinative factors set forth in W.S. 14-6-237(b)(i) through (vii) prior to commencing an action in the district court under this paragraph;

Cases in which the minor has attained the age of fourteen (14) years and is charged with a violent felony as defined by W.S. 6-1-104(a)(xii);

Cases in which a minor who has attained the age of fourteen (14) years is charged with a felony and has previously been adjudicated as a delinquent under two (2) separately filed juvenile petitions for acts which if committed by an adult constitute felonies.

Except as provided by subsection (j) of this section, all information, reports or records made, received or kept by any municipal, county or state officer or employee evidencing any legal or administrative process or disposition resulting from a minor’s misconduct are confidential and subject to the provisions of this act. The existence of the information, reports or records or contents thereof shall not be disclosed by any person unless:

Disclosure results from an action brought or authorized by the district attorney in a court of public record;

The person the records concern is under eighteen (18) years of age and, in conjunction with one (1) of his parents or with the ratification of the court, authorizes the disclosure;

The person the records concern is eighteen (18) years of age or older and authorizes the disclosure;

The disclosure results from the information being shared with or between designated employees of any court, any law enforcement agency, any prosecutor’s office, any employee of the victim services division within the office of the attorney general, any probation office or any employee of the department of family services or the minor’s past or present school district who has been designated to share the information by the department of family services or by the school district or anyone else designated by the district attorney in determining the appropriate court pursuant to a single point of entry assessment under this section;

The disclosure is made to a victim of a delinquent act constituting a felony, in accordance with W.S.

14-6-501

through

14-6-509

;

The disclosure is authorized by W.S.

7-19-504

; or

The disclosure is made to an administrative employee or member of the board of trustees of the minor’s school district, authorized by the court to receive the information, for purposes of the suspension or expulsion of the minor pursuant to W.S. 21-4-305(c)(ii), provided:

The court finds that the court action involves matters which are relevant to the suspension or expulsion of the minor pursuant to W.S. 21-4-305(e). Only materials and evidence relevant to the minor’s potential suspension or expulsion shall be disclosed to an administrative employee or member of the board of trustees of the minor’s school district; and

The school district administrative employees or board of trustee members authorized to receive the minor’s confidential information shall only disclose the information:

To other members of the board of trustees or the superintendent for purposes of W.S. 21-4-305(c)(ii); and

To the minor and his parents, legal guardians, attorneys or guardian ad litem.

Nothing contained in this act is construed to deprive the district court of jurisdiction to determine questions of custody, parental rights, guardianship or any other questions involving minors, when the questions are the subject of or incidental to suits or actions commenced in or transferred to the district court as provided by law.

Nothing contained in this act shall be construed to require confidentiality of any matter, legal record, identity or disposition pertaining to a minor charged or processed through any municipal or circuit court.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.4; Laws 1973, ch. 225, § 1; 1976, ch. 3, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

14-8-104

; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1984, ch. 67, § 1; 1985, ch. 37, § 1; 1989, ch. 117, § 1; ch. 247, § 2; 1994, ch. 84, § 1; 1995, ch. 63, § 1; ch. 154, § 1; 1997, ch. 27, § 2; ch. 28, § 1; ch. 199, §§ 2, 3; 1998, ch. 65, § 1; ch. 81, § 2; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2001, ch. 118, § 2; 2004, ch. 42, § 1; ch. 127, § 2; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2009, ch. 146, § 1; 2013 ch. 168, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2019 ch. 164, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to age of majority and rights upon emancipation, see §

14-1-101

.

The 2004 amendments. —

The first 2004 amendment, by ch. 42, § 1, in (j), deleted “justice of the peace” following “through any municipal.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The second 2004 amendment, by ch. 127, § 2, effective July 1, 2004, in (f)(i) added the exception, and added (f)(ii)(B), making related changes; and in (g)(vi), deleted “or 14-6-240(g)” at the end.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2006 amendment,

in (g), added (or) at the end of (v); and made a related change in (iv).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become a law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (f), added the first three sentences; and in (g)(iv), added “or anyone else designated by the district attorney in determining the appropriate court pursuant to a single point of entry assessment under this section” at the end.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (g)(vii), making related changes.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in the introductory language in (g)(vii) and in (g)(vii)(B)(I), substituted “W.S. 21-4-305(c)(ii)” for “W.S. 21-4-305(d)."

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2024, substituted “14-6-604” for “7-19-504” in (g)(vi).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 14-6-201(a)(xxvi).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Denial of transfer motion. —

Legislature intended the court’s concurrent jurisdiction to include jurisdiction over matters involving an offender who had reached the age of majority but was alleged to have committed a criminal offense as a child; in reading the Juvenile Justice Act as a whole, and in harmony with the grant of general jurisdiction to juvenile courts, it was apparent that the legislature understood and intended that a juvenile court’s jurisdiction would extend to child offenders who had attained the age of majority. Rosen v. State, 2022 WY 16, 503 P.3d 41,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 2022).

Former prosecutorial discretion constitutional. —

Former provisions vesting authority in the prosecuting attorney to decide in the first instance whether charges against a juvenile should be presented to the district court treating the person as an adult or in the juvenile court were constitutional. Jahnke v. State, 692 P.2d 911,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 351

(Wyo. 1984).

Section constitutional. —

Transfer process determinants of confidentiality and burden of proof, as well as the court of jurisdiction, have been uniformly held to constitutionally rest within legislative discretion. The Wyoming legislature has clearly and validly established the courts and transfer processes for the trial of criminal offenses committed by persons under the age of majority. Menapace v. State, 768 P.2d 8,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1989).

The statutory scheme is constitutional; there is no demonstrable prejudice arising out of the failure to assign the burden of proof prior to any hearing; and there was no abuse of discretion on the part of the trial judge in refusing to transfer case to juvenile court or on the part of the trial judge in transferring another case to the county court from juvenile court for a preliminary examination with the view that the case would be prosecuted in the district court. Hansen v. State, 904 P.2d 811,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 194

(Wyo. 1995).

No inherent right to be prosecuted as juvenile. —

Since one does not have an inherent right to be prosecuted as a juvenile but that is a privilege granted by the legislature, the legislature can restrict or qualify the privilege as it sees fit, so long as there is not involved any arbitrary or discriminatory classification. Jahnke v. State, 692 P.2d 911,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 351

(Wyo. 1984).

Interstate Compact on Juveniles does not restrain application of criminal transfer provisions

of this section. Menapace v. State, 768 P.2d 8,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1989).

Concurrent criminal contempt jurisdiction.—

Juvenile court
criminal contempt jurisdiction was concurrent with district courts
because (1) the legislative grant of jurisdiction to juvenile courts
did not use the terms “exclusive” or “concurrent,”
(2) Wyo. Const. art. 5, § 10 granted district courts general criminal jurisdiction,
and (3) juvenile court jurisdiction was to be strictly construed. Brown v. State, 2017 WY 45, 393 P.3d 1265,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2017).

Jurisdiction exists despite erroneous placement of child. —

The trial court's erroneous application of the law relating to the placing of a child adjudged to be neglected did not deprive the court of jurisdiction, nor cause its decree to be void. In In Interest of WM, 778 P.2d 1106,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1989), reh'g denied,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. Aug. 25, 1989).

Juvenile court action suspends district court jurisdiction. —

Where a mother filed a petition to change custody as an adjunct to a prior divorce proceeding while a juvenile court action for neglect was in progress, civil and juvenile jurisdiction was combined from the two parallel actions for the hearing. A juvenile court action does not deprive the district court of its jurisdiction; the action in the juvenile court suspends, at least temporarily, the jurisdiction over the question of custody from the district court. In In Interest of MKM, 792 P.2d 1369,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 1990).

No counseling for parents absent their consent. —

When a child is adjudged by the court to be delinquent and is permitted to live in the parents' home, the consent of the parents is required before the court has authority to order the parents to go to counseling or evaluation. In Interest of C. N., 816 P.2d 1282,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 1991).

Expert testimony on ability of 15-year-old to form specific
intent to commit crime properly excluded.

Excluding
defendant's expert testimony on the ability of a 15-year-old to form
the specific intent to commit a crime did not violate defendant's
right to present a defense because the testimony was not relevant,
as (1) the expert would not have testified that 15-year-olds had no
ability to form such an intent, as the testimony merely suggested
that 15-year-olds were more impulsive than adults and had a reduced
ability to evaluate consequences, (2) to the extent the testimony
could be viewed as evidence of diminished capacity, it was not appropriate
to expand defense of mental incapacity beyond the scope of
Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

7-11-302

, and, (3) the defense of infancy was supplanted by the
legislature's allocation of jurisdiction between juvenile and criminal
courts.
Sen v. State, 2013 WY 47, 301 P.3d 106,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 2013).

Denial of transfer motion. —

District court did not err in denying a juvenile defendant's motion to transfer his case to juvenile court because the district court's analysis demonstrated that it exercised the appropriate judicial discretion in denying a transfer to juvenile court; the court thoroughly considered the evidence and argument presented and gave suitable weight to defendant's lack of maturity but ultimately concluded that defendant's diminished problem-solving and critical thinking skills paled in light of the maturity and sophistication exhibited in carrying out the planned burglaries. The district court likewise considered defendant's juvenile history and contact with law enforcement and his failure to complete probation and concluded that, while greater rehabilitative services would be available to defendant through the juvenile court, defendant was an unlikely candidate for rehabilitation.
Bear Cloud v. State, 2012 WY 16, 275 P.3d 377,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 2012), reh'g denied,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. Mar. 6, 2012), vacated, 568 U.S. 802, 133 S. Ct. 183, 184 L. Ed. 2d 5, 2012 U.S. LEXIS 7508 (U.S. 2012).

Applied

in

KT v. State, 902 P.2d 1288,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1995); McAdams v. State, 907 P.2d 1302,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 220

(Wyo. 1995); Hatch v. State Farm Fire & Cas. Co., 930 P.2d 382,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1996).

Quoted

in

State in Interest of C., 638 P.2d 165,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 410

(Wyo. 1981).

Stated

in

In Interest of MFB, 860 P.2d 1140,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1993).

Cited

in

ELR v. State, 902 P.2d 696,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 1995); Garton v. State, 910 P.2d 1348,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1996).

Law reviews. —

For article “Admissibility of Violations of Law by Child as Evidence in Prosecution of Parents for Criminal Neglect,” see VII Wyo. L.J. 133 (1953).

For article “Administrative Problems Relating to Adoption,” see VIII Wyo. L.J. 210 (1954).

For article “Observations and Suggestions Concerning Wyoming Statutes Relating to Adoption Based on Abandonment,” see VIII Wyo. L.J. 218 (1954).

For comment, “The Institutional Transfer Statute: Three Challenges to the Imprisonment of Juvenile Offenders,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 643 (1982).

For comment, “Prosecution as a Juvenile or an Adult? Is the Discretion Vested in the District Attorney by Section 14-6-203(c) of the Wyoming Statutes Unconstitutional and Violative of the Proper Role of a Prosecutor?” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Marriage as affecting jurisdiction of juvenile court over delinquents or dependents, 14 ALR2d 336.

Homicide by juvenile as within jurisdiction of juvenile court, 48 ALR2d 663.

Age of child at time of alleged offense or delinquency, or at time legal proceedings are commenced, as criterion of jurisdiction of juvenile court, 89 ALR2d 506.

Jurisdiction or power of juvenile court to order parent of juvenile to make restitution for juvenile's offense, 66 ALR4th 985.